Utah statutes.
10-7-70.   Corporate violation -- Summons -- Forms.
Whenever complaint is made against a corporation for violation of a city or
town ordinance summons shall be issued thereon substantially in the following
form:
State of Utah,
County of __________
In the __________ court, in and for the city (or town) of __________, county
of __________ __________ city, (or town) __________
vs. __________
SUMMONS.
The state of Utah, to (naming the corporation):
You are hereby summoned to be and appear before the above entitled court at
the courtroom thereof on the __________ day of __________ at the hour of
__________ o'clock __m., then and there to answer a charge made against you
upon the complaint of __________ for (designating the offense in general
terms), a copy of which complaint is hereto attached.
__________(month\day\year).
Witness:
The Honorable   ___________________________________________________________
Judge of said court.
______________________ Clerk
By      _______________ Deputy Clerk.
In courts having a clerk the summons, with a copy of the complaint attached,
shall be signed by the clerk thereof, and in courts having no clerk the
summons shall be signed by the judge or justice thereof.
